Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
ARTICLE 28
COUNTY PLANNING AND BUILDING CODES

Cross references:

For definitions applicable to this article, see § 30-26-301 (2)(d).

Law reviews:

For article, "Land Use Decisionmaking: Legislative or Quasi-judicial Action", see 18

C

olo. Law. 241 (1989); for article, "Transferable Development Rights and Their Application in

C

olorado: An Overview", see 34 Colo. Law. 75 (March 2005).

Section

PART 1 COUNTY PLANNING

PART 2 BUILDING CODES

PART 3 ESTABLISHMENT OF SUBDIVISION
EXEMPTION PLATS FOR THE
PURPOSE OF CORRECTING
LEGAL DESCRIPTIONS

PART 4 CLUSTER DEVELOPMENT